District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.06

Procedure for denial and revocation of dealer’s license.

(a)

If it appears to the Chief that an application for a dealer’s license should be denied or that a dealer’s license should be revoked, the Chief shall notify the applicant or registrant of the proposed denial or revocation briefly stating the reason or reasons therefor. Service may be made as provided for in § 7-2502.10(a). The applicant or dealer shall have 15 days from the date of service in which to submit further evidence in support of the application or qualifications to continue to hold a dealer’s license, as the case may be; provided, that if the applicant or dealer does not make such a submission within 15 days from the date of service, the applicant or dealer shall be deemed to have conceded the validity of the reason or reasons stated in the notice, and the denial or revocation shall become final.

(b)

Within 10 days of the date upon which the Chief receives such a submission, the Chief shall serve upon the applicant or registrant in the manner provided in § 7-2502.10(a) notice of his final decision. The Chief ’s decision shall become effective at the expiration of the time within which to file a notice of appeal pursuant to the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.) or, if such a notice of appeal is filed, at the time the final order or judgment of the District of Columbia Court of Appeals becomes effective.

(c)

Within 45 days of a decision becoming effective, which is unfavorable to a licensee or to an applicant for a dealer’s license, the licensee or applicant shall:

(1)

If he is eligible to register firearms pursuant to this unit, register such firearms in his inventory as are capable of registration pursuant to this unit;

(2)

Peaceably surrender to the Chief any firearms in his inventory which he does not register, and all destructive devices in his inventory in the manner provided for in § 7-2507.05;

(3)

Lawfully remove from the District any firearm in his inventory which he does not register and all destructive devices and ammunition in his inventory for so long as he has an interest in them; or

(4)

Otherwise lawfully dispose of any firearms in his inventory which he does not register and all destructive devices and ammunition in his inventory.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 406, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-62, § 2, 24 DCR 5780

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2346.
1973 Ed., § 6-1846.